District of Columbia statutes.
18-701

Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter, the term:

(1)

“Authorized person” or “person authorized to act in connection with international wills” means a person who by section 18-709, or by the laws of the United States, including members of the diplomatic and consular service of the United States designated by Foreign Service Regulations, is empowered to supervise the execution of international wills.

(2)

“International will” means a will executed in conformity with sections 18-702 through 18-705.

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-292, § 102(b), 48 DCR 2087
This section is referenced in § 18-708.